Utah statutes.
78B-14-208 (Superseded 07/01/13).   Child-support orders for two or more obligees.

In responding to registrations or petitions for enforcement of two or more child-support orders in effect at the same time with regard to the same obligor and different individual obligees, at least one of which was issued by a tribunal of another state, a tribunal of this state shall enforce those orders in the same manner as if the orders had been issued by a tribunal of this state.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

